Illinois, session 104th, HB5670.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Personal 7Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Illinois Educational 8Labor Relations Board for the objects and purposes hereinafter 9named:10OPERATIONS11  For Personal Services.............................2,059,90012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.......................946,30014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................157,60016  For Group Insurance.................................704,00017  For Contractual Services............................450,00018  For Travel...........................................15,00019  For Commodities.......................................6,00020  For Printing..........................................2,00021  For Equipment........................................55,00022  For Electronic Data Processing.......................44,20023  For Telecommunication Services.......................24,600  HB5670- 2 -OMB104 00244 NLG 10244 b1  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.................1,0002    Total                                          $4,465,600 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.